Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-376
Insurance; policy issued to agent or trustee.

When insurance is issued to an agent or trustee, the fact that his principal or beneficiary is the person really insured is sufficiently indicated by describing him as agent or trustee or by other general words in the policy.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 65, p. 423;

R.S.1913, § 3201;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. IV, § 35, p. 603;

C.S.1922, § 7800;

C.S.1929, § 44-335;

R.S.1943, § 44-376.